Utah statutes.
58-56-9.3.   Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct is as defined in Subsection 58-1-501(2) and includes:

(1)  knowingly failing to inspect or issue correction notices for code violations which when left uncorrected would constitute a hazard to the public health and safety and knowingly failing to require that correction notices are complied with as a building inspector;

(2)  the use of alcohol or the illegal use of drugs while performing duties as a building inspector or at any time to the extent that the inspector is physically or mentally impaired and unable to effectively perform the duties of an inspector;

(3)  gross negligence in the performance of official duties as a building inspector;

(4)  the personal use of information or knowingly revealing information to unauthorized persons when that information has been obtained by a building inspector as a result of the inspector's employment, work, or position as an inspector;

(5)  unlawful acts or practices which are clearly unethical under generally recognized standards of conduct of a building inspector;

(6)  engaging in fraud or knowingly misrepresenting a fact relating to the performance of duties and responsibilities as a building inspector;

(7)  a building inspector knowingly failing to require that all plans, specifications, drawings, documents, and reports be stamped by architects, professional engineers, or both as established by law;

(8)  a building inspector knowingly failing to report to the division an act or omission of a licensee under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act, which when left uncorrected constitutes a hazard to public health and safety;

(9)  a building inspector knowingly failing to report to the division unlicensed practice persons who are required to be licensed under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act;

(10)  a building inspector's approval of work which materially varies from approved documents that have been stamped by an architect, professional engineer, or both unless authorized by the licensed architect, professional engineer, or both;

(11)  a building inspector failing to produce verification of current licensure and current certifications for the codes upon request of the division, a compliance agency, or a contractor or property owner whose work is being inspected;

(12)  nondelivery of goods or services by a registered dealer which constitutes a breach of contract by the dealer;

(13)  the failure of a registered dealer to pay a subcontractor or supplier any amounts to which that subcontractor or supplier is legally entitled; and

(14)  any other activity which is defined as unprofessional conduct by division rule in accordance with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2010 General Session

